Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 43
FLUME AND PIPELINE COMPANIES

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see § 7-90-102.

Section

7-43-101. Certificate for flume companies. (Repealed)

Source:

G.L.

§ 279.

G.S.

§ 316.

R.S. 08:

§ 998.

C.L.

§ 2365.

CSA:

C. 41, § 153.

CRS 53:

§ 31-15-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-15-1.

L. 69:

p. 218, § 1.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 554, § 2, effective April 24.

7-43-102. Certificate for pipeline companies.

Whenever any three or more persons associate under the provisions of law to form a corporation for the purpose of constructing a pipeline for the conveyance of gas, water, or oil, they, in the articles of incorporation, in addition to the matters otherwise required, shall state the places from and to which it is intended to construct the proposed line. Any pipeline corporation formed under the provisions of law shall have the right-of-way over the line named in the articles and shall also have the right to convey gas, water, or oil by said line, as stated in the articles, through lands of the state of Colorado and lands of any persons, and to erect pump stations, storage tanks, and other buildings necessary for such business. If a corporation is unable to agree with the persons owning any of the lands for the purchase of any real estate required for the purpose of any such corporation or company, or the transaction of the business of the same, or for right-of-way, or any other lawful purpose connected with or necessary to the operation of said company, the corporation may acquire such title in the manner provided by law.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 94, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 999.

C.L.

§ 2366.

CSA:

C. 41, § 154.

CRS 53:

§ 31-15-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-15-2.

L. 69:

p. 218, § 2.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2207, § 21, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 22, § 14, effective August 5.

Cross references:

For the power of pipeline companies to exercise the power of eminent domain, see § 38-2-101; for pipeline company rights-of-way, see § 38-4-102.

7-43-103. Nonprofit corporations - powers.

A nonprofit corporation subject to the "Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act", articles 121 to 137 of this title, shall have all of the rights and powers granted by this article to the extent not inconsistent with said act, if such nonprofit corporation otherwise complies with the terms and provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 657, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-15-3.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 756, § 10, effective July 1, 1998.